District of Columbia statutes.
6-403

Condemnation proceedings — Procedures.

The condemnation proceedings herein provided for shall be in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 16 as far as the same are applicable; and the assessment proceedings and assessment area for the establishment of building lines herein provided for shall be the same as that provided in § 9-203.01 et seq., for assessments in the opening, extension, widening, and straightening of alleys or minor streets, in the same manner as if the establishment of building lines had been included in said section.

June 21, 1906, 34 Stat. 384, ch. 3505, § 3
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231,§ 16, 36 DCR 492
1973 Ed., § 5-203.
1981 Ed., § 5-203.